Vermont, session 2025-2026, H862.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. DIVISION OF FIRE SAFETY; AMENDMENTS TO FIRE AND
BUILDING SAFETY CODE; SOUND CONTROL
(a) On or before July 1, 2027, the Division of Fire Safety shall amend the
Fire and Building Safety Code to require that certain public buildings meet
minimum standards for the control of indoor sound and reverberation.
(b)(1) The standards shall, at a minimum, provide that rooms and spaces in
public buildings, except for dwelling units and utility rooms, have a ceiling
constructed with sound-absorbing materials that have a noise reduction
coefficient of at least 0.75 and that cover at least 50 percent of the available
VT LEG #386265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.862
2026 Page 2 of 2
ceiling area. The amendments may set more protective standards for specific
interior spaces in public buildings.
(2) The amendments may include minimum requirements for limiting
sound transmission through interior and exterior walls.
(3) The amendments may include minimum requirements for limiting
the transmission of impact-related sound through floor-ceiling assemblies.
(c) As used in this section, “available ceiling area” means any ceiling
surface that is within view of an occupant of a room or interior space.
“Available ceiling area” does not include structural beams, skylights,
ductwork, and other ceiling components to which sound-absorbing materials
cannot be attached.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386265 v.1